Washington statutes.
RCW 22.09.070

Warehouse licenses—Issuance—Posting—Duration.

The department shall issue a warehouse license to an applicant upon its determination that the applicant has facilities adequate for handling and storage of commodities and, if applicable, conditioning, and that the application is in the proper form and upon approval of the matters contained on the application and upon a showing that the applicant has complied with the provisions of this chapter and rules adopted hereunder. The licensee shall immediately upon receipt of the license post it in a conspicuous place in the office of the licensed warehouse or if a station license, in the main office at the station. The license automatically expires on the date set by rule by the director unless it has been revoked, canceled, or suspended by the department before that date. Fees shall be prorated where necessary to accommodate the staggering of renewal dates of a license or licenses.

[ 1991 c 109 s 27; 1983 c 305 s 25; 1963 c 124 s 7.]

NOTES:

Severability—1983 c 305: See note following RCW 20.01.010.